Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-379
Mutual association; conversion to capital stock association; plan of conversion; approval of members or stockholders; procedure.

If the department approves a plan to conversion in accordance with section 8-378, such plan shall be submitted for adoption to the members or stockholders of the converting association by vote at an annual or special meeting called to consider such action. At least three weeks prior to such meeting, a copy of the plan, together with an accurate summary plan description explaining the operation of the plan and the rights, duties, obligations, liabilities, conditions, and requirements which may be imposed upon such members or stockholders and the converted association as a result of the adoption of such plan, shall be mailed to each member or stockholder eligible to vote at such meeting. The plan of conversion must be approved by not less than sixty percent of the total outstanding shares, which may be voted by proxy or in person at the meeting called to consider such a conversion. If such plan is so approved, action shall be taken to obtain a charter, articles of incorporation, articles of association, or similar instrument, adopt bylaws, elect directors and officers and take such other action as is prescribed or appropriate for the type of corporation into which the converting applicant will be converted. A certified report of the proceedings at such meeting shall be filed promptly with the department.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 24.